Missouri, session 2026, HB3066.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 84.160, 84.210, 84.325, and 105.726, RSMo, are repealed and
four new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 84.160, 84.210, 84.325, and
105.726, to read as follows:
84.160. 1. As of the effective date of this act, the board of police commissioners shall
have the authority to compute and establish the annual salary of each member of the police
force without receiving prior authorization from the general assembly, which shall not be less
than the annual salary paid to any member at the time of the effective date of this act.
2. Each officer of police and patrolman whose regular assignment requires
nonuniformed attire may receive, in addition to his or her salary, an allowance not to exceed
three hundred sixty dollars per annum payable biweekly. Notwithstanding the provisions of
subsection 1 of this section to the contrary, no additional compensation or compensatory time
off for overtime, court time, or standby court time shall be paid or allowed to any officer of
the rank of lieutenant or above. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
nothing in this section shall prohibit the payment of additional compensation pursuant to this
subsection to officers of the ranks of [sergeants] lieutenantand above[, provided that funding
for such compensation shall not:
(1) Be paid from the general funds of either the city or the board of police
commissioners of the city; or
(2) Be] if determined appropriate by the board of police commissioners and is
not violative of any federal law or other state law.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 3066 2
3. It is the duty of the municipal assembly or common council of the cities to make
the necessary appropriation for the expenses of the maintenance of the police force governed
by the board of police commissioners, in the manner provided in section 84.210; except,
pursuant to subsection 2 of Section 21 of Article X of the Missouri Constitution, such
municipal assembly or common council shall appropriate a minimum sum equal to the
following percentages of the city's general revenue:
(1) Twenty-two percent for the period ending December 31, 2025;
(2) Twenty-three percent for the period beginning on January 1, 2026, and ending on
December 31, 2026;
(3) Twenty-four percent for the period beginning on January 1, 2027, and ending on
December 31, 2027; and
(4) Twenty-five percent beginning on January 1, 2028, and for all subsequent years;

to fund the police force governed by the board of police commissioners. Any litigation costs,
including attorney's fees due for representation of the board and individual officers,
settlements or judgments, and pension and retirement costs shall be excluded from the
calculation of expenses for the maintenance of the police force for the purposes of the
minimum funding requirements provided in this subsection.
4. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of this section to the contrary, the
board of police commissioners shall pay additional compensation for all hours of service
rendered by probationary patrolmen, patrolmen, and sergeants in excess of the established
regular working period, and the rate of compensation shall be one and one-half times the
regular hourly rate of pay to which each member shall normally be entitled; except that, the
court time and court standby time shall be paid at the regular hourly rate of pay to which each
member shall normally be entitled. No credit shall be given or deductions made from
payments for overtime for the purpose of retirement benefits.
5. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of this section to the contrary,
probationary patrolmen, patrolmen, and sergeants shall receive additional compensation for
authorized overtime, court time and court standby time whenever the total accumulated time
exceeds forty hours. The accumulated forty hours shall be taken as compensatory time off at
the officer's discretion with the approval of his supervisor.
6. The allowance of compensation or compensatory time off for court standby time
shall be computed at the rate of one-third of one hour for each hour spent on court standby
time.
7. The board of police commissioners shall effect programs to provide additional
compensation to its employees for successful completion of academic work at an accredited
college or university, in amounts not to exceed ten percent of their yearly salaries or for field

HCS HB 3066 3
training officer and lead officer responsibilities in amounts not to exceed three percent of their
yearly salaries for field training officer responsibilities and an additional three percent of their
yearly salaries for lead officer responsibilities. The board may designate up to one hundred
fifty employees as field training officers and up to fifty employees as lead officers.
8. The board of police commissioners:
(1) Shall provide or contract for life insurance coverage and for insurance benefits
providing health, medical and disability coverage for officers and employees of the
department;
(2) Shall provide or contract for insurance coverage providing salary continuation
coverage for officers and employees of the police department;
(3) Shall provide health, medical, and life insurance coverage for retired officers and
employees of the police department. Health, medical and life insurance coverage shall be
made available for purchase to the spouses or dependents of deceased retired officers and
employees of the police department who receive pension benefits pursuant to sections 86.200
to 86.364 at the rate that such dependent's or spouse's coverage would cost under the
appropriate plan if the deceased were living;
(4) May pay an additional shift differential compensation to members of the police
force for evening and night tour of duty in an amount not to exceed ten percent of the officer's
base hourly rate.
9. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of this section to the contrary, the
board of police commissioners shall pay additional compensation to members of the police
force up to and including the rank of police officer for any full hour worked between the
hours of 11:00 p.m. and 7:00 a.m., in amounts equal to ten percent of the officer's base hourly
pay.
10. The board of police commissioners, from time to time and in its discretion, may
pay additional compensation to police officers, sergeants and lieutenants by paying
commissioned officers in the aforesaid ranks for accumulated, unused vacation time. Any
such payments shall be made in increments of not less than forty hours, and at rates
equivalent to the base straight-time rates being earned by said officers at the time of payment;
except that, no such officer shall be required to accept payment for accumulated unused
vacation time.
84.210. 1. It shall be the duty of said boards, annually on or before the last day of
February of each year to prepare, in writing, on such forms as may be prescribed for budget
preparation purposes by such cities for departments of city government, an estimate of the
sum of money which will be necessary for the subsequent fiscal year, to enable them to
discharge the duties hereby imposed upon them, and to meet the expenses of the police
department. Such estimate shall include, but not be limited to, all reasonably anticipated

HCS HB 3066 4
revenues of such boards from all sources including, but not limited to, grants from the federal
or state governments, governmental agencies or other grantors and forfeitures of property and
proceeds of forfeited property, a table of organization, line items for personnel, supplies,
maintenance, repairs, services and contractual requirements, and a statement comparing
receipts and expenses for the last prior full fiscal year, the current fiscal year, and the fiscal
year to which the estimate pertains. Said boards shall forthwith certify such estimate to the
board of common council or municipal assembly, as the case may be, of said cities, who are
hereby required to set apart and appropriate the amount so certified, payable out of the
revenue of said cities, after having first deducted the amount necessary to pay the interest
upon the indebtedness of said cities, the amount necessary for the expenses of the city
hospital and health department, the amount necessary for lighting the city, and any sum
required by law to be placed to the credit of the sinking fund of said cities. [During a fiscal
year for which an appropriation has been so made, said boards shall not transfer funds
appropriated for one line item of such appropriation to any other line item without the prior
approval of the municipal board of estimate and apportionment] Such budget, when adopted
and certified by the board, shall be the authorization of expenditures for the purposes
set forth therein. No transfer from one character classification of expenditure in the
board budget to another character classification shall be made without the approval of
such board.
2. The said boards of police commissioners shall pass upon all claims presented
against them for the expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties as herein provided, and
shall certify, by their president and secretary, all such claims as are entitled to payment and all
salary rolls for salaries as provided in sections 84.010 to 84.340, and such claims and salary
rolls, when so certified, shall be duly audited and paid by the proper disbursing officer or
officers of said cities within five days after being audited, out of any moneys in the city
treasury not appropriated to the specific purposes above enumerated; provided, however, that
the amount of said claims and salary rolls so certified shall not exceed, in any one year, the
amount so, as aforesaid, estimated for that year to the common council or municipal assembly
of said cities aforesaid. The common council or municipal assembly of said cities shall have
no power or authority to levy or collect any taxes or appropriate any money for the payment
of any police force, other than that organized and employed under sections 84.010 to 84.340.
No officer or servant of the mayor or the common council or municipal assembly of said
cities shall disburse any money for the payment of any police force other than that organized
and employed under sections 84.010 to 84.340, and the power of said mayor and common
council or municipal assembly to appropriate and disburse money for the payment of the
police force organized and employed under sections 84.010 to 84.340 shall be exercised as in
this section directed and not otherwise.

HCS HB 3066 5
84.325. 1. A transition director shall be appointed by the governor to ensure
oversight of an orderly transition of the control of any municipal police force from any city
not within a county to the board of police commissioners. The implementation period shall
begin on the effective date of this act, and end no later than July 1, [2026] 2027. The board of
police commissioners shall assume control of any municipal police force established within
any city not within a county during the implementation period, according to the procedures
and requirements of this section and any rules promulgated under subsection 6 of this section
and as determined in coordination with the transition director, local officials, and the board of
police commissioners. The purpose of these procedures and requirements is to ensure the
continuity of operations of the municipal police force with minimized disruptions to the
residents of any city not within a county, to provide for an orderly and appropriate transition
in the governance of the police force, and to provide for an equitable employment transition
for commissioned and civilian personnel.
2. Upon the assumption of control by the board of police commissioners under
subsection 1 of this section, any municipal police department within any city not within a
county shall convey, assign, and otherwise transfer to the board title and ownership of all
indebtedness and assets, including, but not limited to, all funds and real and personal property
held in the name of or controlled by the municipal police department. Such city shall
thereafter cease the operation of any police department or police force.
3. Upon the assumption of control by the board of police commissioners under
subsection 1 of this section, the [state] board of police commissioners shall accept
responsibility[,] and ownership[, and liability] as successor-in-interest for contractual
obligations [and other lawful obligations] of the municipal police department. Liability for
payment of any claim, lawsuit, or other action, including settlements or judgments, as
well as litigation costs and attorney's fees due for representation of the board and
individual employees and officers, shall remain with any city not within a county
without reimbursement from the state legal expense fund, except for reimbursement to
the board under subsection 3 of section 105.726, or any offset to the board's minimum
appropriation to fund the police force governed by the board of police commissioners
under subsection 3 of section 84.160.
4. The board of police commissioners shall initially employ, without a reduction in
rank, salary, or benefits, all commissioned and civilian personnel of the municipal police
department who were employed by the municipal police department immediately prior to the
date the board assumed control. The board shall recognize all accrued years of service that
such commissioned and civilian personnel had with the municipal police department, as well
as all accrued years of service that such commissioned and civilian personnel had previously
with the board of police commissioners. Such personnel shall be entitled to the same

HCS HB 3066 6
holidays, vacation, sick leave, sick bonus time, and annual step increases they were entitled to
as employees of the municipal police department.
5. The commissioned and civilian personnel who retire from service with the
municipal police department before the board of police commissioners assumed control of the
department under subsection 1 of this section shall continue to be entitled to the same pension
benefits provided as employees of the municipal police department and the same benefits set
forth in subsection 4 of this section. Any police pension system created under chapter 86 for
the benefit of a police force established under sections 84.012 to 84.340 shall continue to be
governed by chapter 86 and shall apply to any comprehensive policing plan and any police
force established under sections 84.012 to 84.340. Other than any provision that makes
chapter 86 applicable to a municipal police force established under sections 84.343 to 84.346,
nothing in sections 84.012 to 84.340 shall be construed as limiting or changing the rights or
benefits provided under chapter 86.
6. The board of police commissioners may promulgate all necessary rules and
regulations for the implementation and administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536
are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to
chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
proposed or adopted after March 26, 2025, shall be invalid and void.
105.726. 1. Nothing in sections 105.711 to 105.726 shall be construed to broaden the
liability of the state of Missouri beyond the provisions of sections 537.600 to 537.610, nor to
abolish or waive any defense at law which might otherwise be available to any agency,
officer, or employee of the state of Missouri. Sections 105.711 to 105.726 do not waive the
sovereign immunity of the state of Missouri.
2. The creation of the state legal expense fund and the payment therefrom of such
amounts as may be necessary for the benefit of any person covered thereby are deemed
necessary and proper public purposes for which funds of this state may be expended.
3. Moneys in the state legal expense fund shall not be available for the payment of
any claim or any amount required by any final judgment rendered by a court of competent
jurisdiction against a board of police commissioners established under chapter 84, including
the commissioners, any police officer, notwithstanding sections 84.330 and 84.710, or other
provisions of law, other employees, agents, representative, or any other individual or entity
acting or purporting to act on its or their behalf. Such was the intent of the general assembly
in the original enactment of sections 105.711 to 105.726, and it is made express by this

HCS HB 3066 7
section in light of the decision in Wayman Smith, III, et al. v. State of Missouri, 152 S.W.3d
275. Except that the commissioner of administration shall reimburse from the legal expense
fund the boards of police commissioners established under chapter 84 for liability claims
otherwise eligible for payment under section 105.711 paid by such boards on an equal share
basis per claim up to a collective maximum of two million dollars per fiscal year.
4. If the representation of the attorney general is requested by a board of police
commissioners, the attorney general shall represent, investigate, defend, negotiate, or
compromise all claims under sections 105.711 to 105.726 for the board of police
commissioners, any police officer, other employees, agents, representatives, or any other
individual or entity acting or purporting to act on their behalf. The attorney general may
establish procedures by rules promulgated under chapter 536 under which claims must be
referred for the attorney general's representation. The attorney general and the officials of the
city which the police board represents shall meet and negotiate reasonable expenses or
charges that will fairly compensate the attorney general and the office of administration for
the cost of the representation of the claims under this section.
5. Claims tendered to the attorney general promptly after the claim was asserted as
required by section 105.716 and prior to August 28, 2005, may be investigated, defended,
negotiated, or compromised by the attorney general and full payments may be made from the
state legal expense fund on behalf of the entities and individuals described in this section as a
result of the holding in Wayman Smith, III, et al. v. State of Missouri, 152 S.W.3d 275.
✔